Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.090

Local sales and use tax increments.

(1) A sponsoring local government may use annually local sales and use tax amounts equal to some or all of its local sales and use tax increments to finance public improvements in the revitalization area. The amounts of local sales and use tax dedicated by a participating local government must begin and cease on the dates specified in an interlocal agreement authorized in chapter 39.34 RCW. Sponsoring local governments and participating local governments are authorized to allocate some or all of their local sales and use tax increment to the sponsoring local government as provided by RCW 39.104.070(1).

(2) The department, upon request, must assist sponsoring local governments in estimating sales and use tax revenues from estimated taxable activity in the proposed or adopted revitalization area. The sponsoring local government must provide the department with accurate information describing the geographical boundaries of the revitalization area in an electronic format or in a manner as otherwise prescribed by the department.

[ 2009 c 270 s 301.]